Illinois, session 104th, HB4191.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-117.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-117.1)7    Sec. 6-117.1. Prohibited use of driver's license 8information.9    (a) When information is obtained from a driver's license 10to identify or prove the age of the holder of the license, or 11in the course of a commercial transaction, that information 12may be used only for purposes of identification of the 13individual or for completing the commercial transaction in 14which the information was obtained, including all subsequent 15payment, processing, collection, and other related actions. 16Information obtained from a driver's license may not be used 17for purposes unrelated to the transaction in which it was 18obtained, including, but not limited to, commercial 19solicitations. Information obtained from a driver's license to 20identify the holder of the license, or in the course of a 21commercial transaction, may not be sold, leased, or otherwise 22provided to any third party.23    (a-1) No information obtained from a driver's license may   HB4191- 2 -LRB104 15920 LNS 29152 b1be collected under this Section if the information may be used 2to discriminate against the individual.3    (a-2) Any person or entity that obtains information under 4this Section must disclose to the individual that the 5individual's information is being collected. Such disclosure 6may be in the form of written consent from the individual that 7the individual's information may be collected.8    (a-3) Any person who's information is collected under this 9Section may request, and shall be provided, a copy of the 10information collected. 11    (b) Any individual whose driver's license information has 12been used in violation of this Section has a cause of action 13against the person who violated this Section. Upon a finding 14that a violation did occur, the individual whose information 15was used in violation of this Section is entitled to recover 16actual damages, but not less than liquidated damages in the 17amount of $250 for each violation, plus attorney's fees and 18the costs of bringing the action.19    (c) Use of information contained on a driver's license is 20not a violation of this Section if (i) the individual whose 21information has been used gave express permission for that use 22or (ii) the information relating to the individual was 23obtained from a source other than the individual's driver's 24license.25    (d) This Section does not apply to any agency of the United 26States, the State of Illinois, or any other state or political   HB4191- 3 -LRB104 15920 LNS 29152 b1subdivision thereof.2    (e) This Section does not apply to the transfer of 3information to a third party if (i) a federal or State law, 4rule, or regulation requires that the information be 5transferred to a third party after being recorded in specified 6transactions or (ii) the information is transferred to a third 7party for purposes of the detection or possible prosecution of 8criminal offenses or fraud. If information is transferred to a 9third party under this subsection (e), it may be used only for 10the purposes authorized by this subsection (e). 11    (f) This Section does not apply to the use of information 12obtained from a driver's license which has been provided by 13the holder of the license in the course of a potential or 14completed employment, commercial, business or professional 15transaction for the purpose of completing written documents 16including, but not limited to, contracts, agreements, purchase 17orders, retail installment contracts, buyer's orders, purchase 18contracts, repair orders, applications, disclosure forms or 19waiver forms. 20(Source: P.A. 94-892, eff. 1-1-07.)